District of Columbia statutes.
1-805.04

Federal information sharing for verification of benefit determinations.

(a)

In general. —

Except with respect to taxpayer returns and return information subject to § 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, the Secretary may:

(1)

Secure directly from any department or agency of the United States information necessary to enable the Secretary to verify or confirm benefit determinations under this chapter; and

(2)

By regulation authorize the Trustee to review such information for purposes of administering this chapter and the contract.

(b)

Omitted.

(c)

Confidentiality. —

The Secretary may issue regulations governing the confidentiality of the information obtained pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and the provisions of law amended by § 11024(b) of the District of Columbia Retirement Protection Act of 1997.

History

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 721, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11024

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-763.4.

References in Text

Section 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, referred to in the introductory paragraph of (a), is 26 U.S.C § 6103.

Section 11024(b) of the District of Columbia Retirement Protection Act of 1997, referred to in (c), is § 11024(b) of subtitle A of Title XI of Pub. L. 105-33, 111 Stat. 715.

Editor's Notes

Amendments to Internal Revenue Code: For amendments to the Internal Revenue Code related to District of Columbia Retirement Programs, see § 11024(b) of Title XI of Pub. L. 105-33, 111 Stat. 721, the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997.